Arkansas, session 2025, HB1798.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 27, Chapter 15, Subchapter 1 is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
27-15-103. Legislative intent — Green Envelope Program.
(a) The General Assembly intends to establish a Green Envelope Program
to ease communication between an individual who is diagnosed with mental
illness and a law enforcement officer during any interaction, including
without limitation a motor vehicle-related interaction.
(b)(1) By January 1, 2026, the Department of Finance and
Administration shall develop and make available a specially designed green
envelope that will hold a driver’s essential documents, including without
limitation a driver’s license, vehicle registration, and contact card.
(2) The green envelope developed under subsection (b)(1) of this
section shall include communication guidelines on the exterior of the green
envelope that are specifically tailored to assist a law enforcement officer
in recognizing an individual with a mental illness and adapting his or her
approach when interacting with a individual with a mental illness.
(c) Beginning January 1, 2026, an individual diagnosed with a mental
illness may request a green envelope at his or her local department office.

*JMB505*
03-19-2025 14:07:07 JMB505

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1798
/s/Nazarenko



































03-19-2025 14:07:07 JMB505